West Virginia, session 2026, SB494.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 22. STATE LOTTERY ACT. §29-22-9b. Fire department instant lottery scratch-off game. (a) Beginning September 1, 2026, the commission shall establish an instant lottery scratch-off game designated as the fire department instant lottery scratch off game, which is offered by the lottery.(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of §29-22-18 of this code, all net profits received from the sale of fire department instant lottery scratch off game tickets are deposited with the State Treasurer into the All County Fire Protection Fund, created pursuant to §7-5B-2 of this code. Appropriations from this fund will be made in accordance with the provisions of that section. (c) The commission shall change the design or theme of the Fire department instant lottery scratch off game regularly so that the game remains competitive with the other instant lottery scratch-off games offered by the commission. The tickets for the instant lottery game created in this section shall clearly state that the profits derived from the game are being used to benefit fire departments in this state. §29-22-9c. Emergency medical services instant lottery scratch-off game. (a) Beginning September 1, 2026, the commission shall establish an instant lottery scratch-off game designated as the emergency medical services instant scratch off game, which is offered by the lottery.(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of §29-22-18 of this code, all net profits received from the sale of emergency medical services instant scratch off game lottery tickets, materials, and games are deposited with the state Treasurer into the Emergency Medical Services Equipment and Training Fund created under §16-4C-24 of this code. Appropriations from this fund will be made in accordance with the provisions of that section (c) The commission shall change the design or theme of the Emergency Medical Services instant lottery scratch off game regularly so that the game remains competitive with the other instant lottery scratch-off games offered by the commission. The tickets for the instant lottery game created in this section shall clearly state that the profits derived from the game are being used to benefit emergency medical services in this state. §29-22-9d. Schools instant lottery scratch-off game. (a) Beginning September 1, 2026, the commission shall establish an instant lottery scratch-off game designated as the school lottery scratch off game, which is offered by the lottery.(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of §29-22-18 of this code, all net profits received from the sale of school instant lottery scratch off game tickets are deposited with the State Treasurer into the Innovation in Education Fund, created pursuant to §18-5E-7 of this code. Appropriations from this fund will be made in accordance with the provisions of that section. (c) The commission shall change the design or theme of the school instant lottery scratch off game regularly so that the game remains competitive with the other instant lottery scratch-off games offered by the commission. The tickets for the instant lottery game created in this section shall clearly state that the profits derived from the game are being used to benefit schools in this state. §29-22-9e. Roads instant lottery scratch-off game. (a) Beginning September 1, 2026, the commission shall establish an instant lottery scratch-off game designated as the roads lottery scratch off game, which is offered by the lottery.(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of §29-22-18 of this code, all net profits received from the sale of roads instant lottery scratch off game tickets are deposited with the State Treasurer into the State Road Fund, created pursuant to §17-3-1 et seq. of this code. Appropriations from this fund will be made in accordance with the provisions of that section. (c) The commission shall change the design or theme of the roads instant lottery scratch off game regularly so that the game remains competitive with the other instant lottery scratch-off games offered by the commission. The tickets for the instant lottery game created in this section shall clearly state that the profits derived from the game are being used to benefit roads in this state.